Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 2027 INTERNATIONAL ICE HOCKEY FEDERATION U18 MEN'S WORLD CHAMPIONSHIP.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to Minnesota Sports and Events for costs related to the 2027 International Ice Hockey Federation U18 Men's World Championship, which will occur in Duluth in 2027. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end